Illinois, session 104th, SB3267.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sustainable Agriculture Act is amended by 5adding Section 7 as follows: 6    (505 ILCS 135/7 new)7    Sec. 7. Dust Storm Study.8    (a) The General Assembly finds that:9        (1) In May of 2025, northern Illinois and the City of 10    Chicago were hit with a severe dust storm, the likes of 11    which had not been seen in the region since the Dust Bowl 12    of the 1930s.13        (2) In 2023, a dust storm occurred in the State along 14    the Sangamon County and Montgomery County line on I-55, 15    causing over 70 accidents, 37 injuries, and 7 fatalities.16        (3) Exposed soil and a lack of windbreaks influenced 17    the formation and severity of these severe dust storms 18    observed in recent years.19        (4) The increasingly common phenomenon of dust storms 20    in Illinois negatively impacts commerce and agriculture 21    within the State and endangers the public.22        (5) The Department of Agriculture and the Department 23    of Natural Resources have the expertise to evaluate and   SB3267- 2 -LRB104 19278 TRT 32724 b1    present findings related to the threat of future dust 2    storms within the State, to assess how climate change and 3    drought may exacerbate those threats, and to recommend 4    corrective actions that can be taken to reduce the 5    likelihood of future dust storms.6    (b) Therefore, the Department of Agriculture and the 7Department of Natural Resources shall conduct a joint study to 8evaluate the threat of future dust storms within the State and 9the potential solutions to those storms. The Departments shall 10consider and shall publish findings on how the risk of dust 11storms may vary across the State.12    (c) The joint study shall evaluate corrective actions that 13may be adopted within the agricultural sector to mitigate dust 14storm occurrences and severity, including:15        (1) corrective actions that can be taken to reduce the 16    likelihood of dust storms occurring;17        (2) corrective actions that will incentivize 18    widespread vegetative windbreak adoption;19        (3) corrective actions that will incentivize cover 20    crop adoption; and21        (4) corrective actions that will incentive the 22    adoption of permaculture practices by farmers.23    (d) The Department of Agriculture and the Department of 24Natural Resources shall coordinate with the Illinois Emergency 25Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security to evaluate 26and publish findings on:  SB3267- 3 -LRB104 19278 TRT 32724 b1        (1) the short-term and long-term threats of dust 2    storms; and3        (2) the protocol that should be developed to protect 4    the public from current and future threats posed by dust 5    storms.6    (e) The Department of Agriculture and the Department of 7Natural Resources may solicit information from entities that 8have been impacted by the 2023 and 2025 dust storms and from 9entities the Departments determine are likely to be impacted 10by future dust storms. The Department of Agriculture and the 11Department of Natural Resources may consult with and seek 12assistance from other similar state agencies in other states 13and federal agencies to the extent that such coordination aids 14in furthering the purposes of the study required under this 15Section.16    (f) The Department of Agriculture and the Department of 17Natural Resources shall publish the joint study on an 18agreed-upon publicly available website and shall provide 19suitable copies to the Governor and the General Assembly by no 20later than December 1, 2027.